Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
TENANT IMPROVEMENTS TO MANUFACTURED DWELLING SPACES
SECTION 1.  ORS 90.514 is amended to read:
90.514. (1) Before a prospective tenant signs a rental agreement for space in a manufactured
dwelling park or for a converted rental space,  the landlord must provide the prospective tenant with
a written statement that discloses the improvements that the landlord will require under  the rental
agreement. The written statement must be in the  format developed by the Attorney General pursu-
ant to ORS 90.516 and include at least the following:
(a) A notice that the tenant may  select and contract directly with a contractor to be the pro-
vider of an improvement.
(b) Separately stated and identifiable information for each required improvement that specifies:
(A) The dimensions, materials and finish for improvements to be constructed  or repaired;
(B) The [ installation charges imposed by the landlord and the ] installation fees  imposed by gov-
ernment agencies;  and
[(C) The system development charges to be paid by the tenant; and ]
[(D)] (C) The site preparation requirements and restrictions, including, but  not limited to, re-
quirements and restrictions on the use of plants and landscaping.
(c) Identification of the improvements that belong to the tenant and the  improvements that must
remain with the space.
(2) A landlord may not require as part of the improvements under  the rental agreement
that a tenant:
(a) Pay any fee to the landlord for improvements.
(b) Pay any system development charges.
(c) Construct  or repair an improvement that cannot be reasonably removed and owned
by the tenant at the termination of  the tenancy, except for porches, stairs, decks, awnings,
carports, sheds or vegetative  landscaping on the site or any other improvements necessary
for the safe and lawful installation of the manufactured dwelling.
[(2)] (3) Except as provided in ORS 41.740, a written statement provided under this section is
considered to contain all of the terms relating  to improvements that a prospective tenant must make
Enrolled House Bill 3151 (HB 3151-A) Page 1
under the rental agreement. There may be  no evidence of the terms of the written statement other
than the contents of the written statement.
NOTE: Section 2 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
DISPUTE RESOLUTION FOR FACILITY TENANTS
SECTION 3.  Section 9, chapter 625, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 9.  (1) The Housing and Community Services Department shall award grants  to persons to
provide legal [ representation] assistance  to low-income facility tenants in addressing issues and
disputes involving [ legal matters arising  under ] ORS chapter 90. The legal assistance may be in
the form of outreach,  education, advice, case representation and similar efforts. Grants may
be used to cover the employee-related expenses of attorneys who provide legal assistance
under this section.
(2) The department may adopt rules and income level criteria to implement this program.
(3) In selecting entities for grants under this section,  the department shall consider the experi-
ence and qualifications of the entities relating to:
(a) Representing tenants in disputes arising under ORS chapter 90;
(b) Serving tenants throughout the state,  including by telephone or online communications or
resources when appropriate; and
(c) Ability to network with other attorneys to leverage the available legal assistance.
(4) Total  grant amounts awarded under this section may only come from the Manufactured and
Marina Communities account under ORS  [ 446.533] 456.414 and may not exceed $200,000 per
biennium.
SECTION 4.
 Section 12, chapter 625, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 12.  Sections 9 and 10 , chapter 625, Oregon Laws 2019,  [ of this 2019 Act ] are repealed
January 2, [ 2024] 2027.
NOTE: Section 5 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
AFFORDABLE HOUSING ON NONRESIDENTIAL LANDS
SECTION 6.  ORS 197.308, as amended by section 4, chapter 47, Oregon Laws 2022,  is amended
to read:
197.308. (1) As used in this section, “affordable housing” means residential property:
(a) In which:
(A) Each unit  on the property is made available to own or rent to families with incomes of 80
percent or less  of the area median income as determined by the Oregon Housing Stability Council
based on information from the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development; [ or]
(B) The average of all units on the property is made available to families with incomes  of 60
percent or less of the area median income; [ and] or
(C) A manufactured dwelling park is operated that serves  only households with incomes
of 120 percent or less of the area median income; and
(b) Whose affordability is enforceable, including as described in ORS 456.270 to  456.295, for a
duration of no less than 30 years.
(2) A local government shall  allow affordable housing, and may not require a zone change or
conditional use permit for affordable housing, if the  proposed affordable housing is on property that
is:
(a) Owned by:
(A) A public body, as defined in ORS 174.109; [ or]
(B) A nonprofit corporation that is organized as a religious corporation; [ or]
(C) A nonprofit corporation that is organized as  a public benefit corporation whose pri-
mary purpose is the development of affordable housing;
(D) A housing authority, as defined in ORS 456.005; or
Enrolled House Bill 3151 (HB 3151-A) Page 2
(E) A manufactured dwelling park nonprofit cooperative, as defined in ORS 62.803; or
(b) Zoned:
(A) For commercial uses;
(B) To allow religious assembly; or
(C) As public lands.
(3) Subsection (2) of this section:
(a) Does not apply to the development of housing not within an urban growth boundary.
(b) Does not trigger any requirement that a local  government consider or update an analysis
as required by a statewide planning goal relating to economic development.
(c) Applies on property zoned to allow for industrial uses only if the property is:
(A) Publicly owned;
(B) Adjacent to lands zoned for residential uses or schools; and
(C) Not specifically designated for heavy industrial uses.
(d) Does not apply on lands where the local government determines that:
(A) The development  on the property cannot be adequately served by water, sewer, storm water
drainage or streets, or will not be adequately served at the time  that development on the lot is
complete;
(B) The property contains a slope of 25 percent or greater;
(C) The property is within a 100-year floodplain; or
(D) The development of the property is  constrained by land use regulations based on statewide
land use planning goals relating to:
(i) Natural disasters and hazards; or
(ii) Natural resources,  including air, water, land or natural areas, but not including open spaces
or historic resources.
(4) A local government  shall approve an application at an authorized density level and author-
ized height level, as defined  in ORS 227.175 (4), for the development of affordable housing, at the
greater of:
(a) Any local density bonus for affordable housing; or
(b) Without consideration of any local density bonus for affordable housing:
(A) For property with  existing maximum density of 16 or fewer units per acre, 200 percent of
the existing density and 12 additional feet;
(B) For property with existing maximum density  of 17 or more units per acre and 45 or fewer
units per acre, 150 percent of the existing density and 24 additional feet; or
(C) For property with existing maximum density of 46 or more units per acre, 125  percent of the
existing density and 36 additional feet.
(5)(a) Subsection  (4) of this section does not apply to housing allowed under subsection (2) of this
section in areas that are not zoned for residential uses.
(b) A local government may reduce  the density or height of the density bonus allowed under
subsection (4) of  this section as necessary to address a health, safety or habitability issue, including
fire safety, or to comply with a protective measure adopted pursuant to a  statewide land use plan-
ning goal. Notwithstanding ORS  197.350, the local government must adopt findings supported by
substantial evidence demonstrating the necessity of this reduction.
NOTE:
 Section 7 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
MANUFACTURED DWELLING PARK LOAN PROGRAM
SECTION 8.  ORS 458.352, as amended by section 20, chapter 54, Oregon Laws  2022, is amended
to read:
458.352. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Average income” means an  income that complies with income restrictions determined at the
advice and consent of the Oregon Housing Stability Council, but not to  exceed the greater of 100
percent of the  statewide or local area median income adjusted for household size as determined
Enrolled House Bill 3151 (HB 3151-A) Page 3
annually by the Housing and Community  Services Department using United States Department of
Housing and Urban Development information.
(b) “Manufactured dwelling park” has the meaning given that term in ORS 446.003.
(c) “Nonprofit corporation” means a corporation that is  exempt from income taxes under section
501(c)(3) or (4) of the Internal Revenue Code as amended and in effect on December 31, 2016.
(2) The Housing and Community Services  Department shall provide one or more loans to
nonprofit corporations to create manufactured  dwelling park preservation and development pro-
grams that invest in, and provide loans  for, the preservation [ and affordability of ], development and
expansion of affordable manufactured dwelling parks in this state, including through:
(a) The repair or reconstruction of parks destroyed by natural disasters; or
(b) The acquisition and development  of land for parks or for the expansion of parks in areas that
have been affected by a natural disaster.
(3) To be eligible for a  loan under this section, a nonprofit corporation shall demonstrate to the
satisfaction of the department that the nonprofit corporation:
(a) Is a community development financial institution operating statewide  to support investment
in, and acquisition, renovation and construction of, affordable housing;
(b) Has the ability and capacity to provide the services and reporting required of the program
described in subsections (4) and (6) of this section; and
(c) Meets other  requirements established by the department regarding financial risk and avail-
ability or accessibility of additional resources.
(4) An eligible nonprofit corporation, with  input from the department, shall develop a manufac-
tured dwelling park development and preservation program that:
(a) Invests  in, and loans funds to, other nonprofit corporations, housing authorities, manufac-
tured dwelling park nonprofit cooperatives as  defined in ORS 62.803, local units of government as
defined in ORS 466.706, agencies as defined in ORS 183.310, or any entity in which a nonprofit cor-
poration has a controlling share, to:
(A) Purchase or refinance manufactured  dwelling parks that will maintain the parks as parks
long term; or
(B) Construct, develop, expand, repair or reconstruct parks , including parks destroyed  by na-
tural disasters;
(b) Emphasizes, when providing loans under paragraph (a)  of this subsection, the financing of
parks whose residents are predominantly members of  households with income less than average in-
come; and
(c) Preserves the affordability of the park space  rent to park tenants who are members of
households with income less than average income.
(5) An eligible nonprofit corporation shall create a park  development and preservation account
to be  used by the nonprofit corporation for the manufactured dwelling park preservation program
and shall deposit the moneys loaned by the department into the account.
(6) An eligible nonprofit  corporation shall ensure that all financial activities of the program are
paid from and into the park development and preservation  account created under subsection (5)
of this section. Each nonprofit corporation shall report to  the department no less than semiannually,
showing the  expenses and incomes of the park development and preservation account and the re-
sults of the manufactured dwelling park development and preservation program.
(7) A loan made by the department under this section:
(a) May require the nonprofit corporation to pay interest.
(b) May not require the nonprofit corporation  to make any loan payments before the maturity
date of the loan.
(c) Must have a maturity date of no later than September 15, 2036.
(d) May have its maturity date extended by the department.
(e) Shall have  all or part of the unpaid balance forgiven by the department in an amount not
to exceed the losses incurred on investments  or loans made by the nonprofit corporation under
subsection (4)(a) of this section.
Enrolled House Bill 3151 (HB 3151-A) Page 4
(f) May include such agreements  by the nonprofit corporation practical to secure the loan made
by the  department and to accomplish the purposes of the program described in subsection (4) of this
section.
(8) The department or  the State Treasurer shall deposit moneys received in servicing the loan
into the General Housing Account of the Oregon Housing Fund created under ORS 458.620.
SECTION 9. The Housing and  Community Services Department may negotiate with
nonprofit corporations that received loans under ORS 458.352 (2) before the effective date of
this 2023 Act to allow the nonprofit corporation  to use those moneys consistent with ORS
458.352 as amended by section 8 of this 2023 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 10. The unit captions used in this 2023 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2023 Act.
Passed by House March 22, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 22, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3151 (HB 3151-A) Page 5